District of Columbia statutes.
9-202.13

Disposition of closing act and plat.

Upon the recordation of the plat, the Surveyor shall send a copy of the act and the plat to the applicant and to the Director of the Department of Finance and Revenue.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 213, 30 DCR 148

History

1981 Ed., § 7-433.

Prior Codifications

Pursuant to the Office of the Chief Financial Officer’s “Notice of Public Interest” published in the April 18, 1997, issue of the District of Columbia Register ( 44 DCR 2345) the Office of Tax and Revenue assumed all of the duties and functions previously performed by the Department of Finance and Revenue, as set forth in Commissioner’s Order 69-96, dated March 7, 1969. This action was made effective January 22, 1997, nunc pro tunc.

References in Text